North Carolina statutes. Chapter 63A. North Carolina Global TransPark Authority.
§ 63A-9.
Bonds and notes.

The Authority may provide for the issuance, at one time or from time to time, of bonds and notes, including bond anticipation notes and renewal notes, of the Authority to carry out its corporate purposes including financing the costs of projects. The principal of and interest on the bonds or notes shall be payable from funds provided under this Chapter for their payment. A bond anticipation note may be made payable from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or, in the event bond or renewal note proceeds are not available, from any available Authority revenues or other funds provided for this purpose. Bonds and notes may also be paid from the proceeds of any credit facility.All bonds, notes, or refunding bonds or notes of the Authority are subject to this section and

G.S. 63A-10

. All bonds, notes, or refunding bonds or notes to finance or refinance a special user project are also subject to

G.S. 63A-11

.The bonds and notes of each issue shall be dated and may be made redeemable prior to maturity at the option of the Authority or otherwise, at one or more prices, on one or more dates, and upon the terms and conditions set by the Authority. The bonds or notes may also be made payable from time to time on demand or tender for purchase by the owner upon terms and conditions set by the Authority.A bond or note shall bear interest at a rate or rates, including variable rates, as determined by the Local Government Commission with the approval of the Authority. A bond or note may be secured by a reserve fund created for that purpose and funded from proceeds of the bond or note, revenues, or any other source of funds available to the Authority.

In fixing the details of bonds or notes, the Authority may provide that the bonds or notes may:

Be payable from time to time on demand or tender for purchase by the owner of the bond or note if a credit facility supports the bond or note, unless the Local Government Commission specifically determines that a credit facility is not required because the absence of a credit facility will not materially and adversely affect the financial position of the Authority and the marketing of the bonds or notes at a reasonable interest cost to the Authority.

Be additionally supported by a credit facility.

Be made subject to redemption or a mandatory tender for purchase prior to maturity.

Be capital appreciation bonds.

Bear interest at a rate or rates that may vary, including variations permitted pursuant to a par formula.

Be made the subject of a remarketing agreement whereby an attempt is made to remarket the bonds or notes to new purchasers prior to their presentment for payment to the provider of the credit facility or to the Authority.

Notes and bonds shall mature at the times determined by the Authority, not to exceed 40 years from the date of issue. The Authority shall determine the form and manner of execution of a bond or note, including any interest coupons to be attached to the bond or note. The Authority shall fix the denominations and places of payment of principal and interest of the bond or note. The principal of and interest on a bond or note may be paid at any bank or trust company, whether located inside or outside the United States of America.

The validity of a bond, note, or coupon that has the signature or facsimile signature of a person who was an officer when the bond, note, or coupon was signed or the facsimile signature attached but who is not that officer when the bond, note, or coupon is delivered is not affected by the change in officers. A bond, note, or coupon may bear the signature or facsimile signature of a person who will be the proper officer to sign the bond, note, or coupon when it is executed but who is not the officer on the date of the bond, note, or coupon.

The Authority may provide for any of the following:

Authentication of a bond or note by a trustee or other authenticating agent.

Issuance of a bond or note as a certificated obligation, an uncertificated obligation, or both.

Issuance of a bond or note in coupon form, in registered form, or both.

Registration of a coupon bond or note as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest.

The reconversion of a bond or note registered as to both principal and interest into a coupon bond or note.

The interchange of registered and coupon bonds or notes.

A system for registration in accordance with Chapter 159E of the General Statutes.

Replacement of a bond or note that has been mutilated, lost, or destroyed.

The Authority may not issue a bond or note under this Chapter, other than an obligation permitted under G.S. 63A-4(a)(22), unless its issuance is approved by the Local Government Commission, and it is sold by the Local Government Commission. To obtain approval of a bond or note, the Authority shall file an application for approval with the Local Government Commission. The application shall contain the information required by the Local Government Commission.In determining whether to approve a proposed bond or note issue of the Authority, the Local Government Commission shall consider the following:

For bonds or notes to finance airport projects, the criteria for its approval of revenue bonds under

G.S. 159-86

.

For bonds or notes to finance special user projects, the criteria used for its approval of industrial bonds under

G.S. 159C-8

.

The effect of the proposed financing upon any proposed or scheduled sale of obligations by the State, another State agency, or a unit of local government.

The Local Government Commission shall approve the proposed bond or note issue if it determines that the proposed financing for the issue meets the criteria and will effect the purposes of this Chapter.When the Local Government Commission approves a bond or note issue of the Authority, the Authority may submit a written request to the Local Government Commission to sell the approved bonds or notes. Upon receiving a written request, the Local Government Commission shall consult with the Authority on the manner in which the bonds or notes will be sold and the price or prices at which the bonds or notes will be sold. With the approval of the Authority, the Local Government Commission shall sell the bonds or notes either at public or private sale in the manner and at the prices determined to be in the best interest of the Authority and to effect the purposes of this Chapter.Bonds or notes may be issued under this Chapter without obtaining, except as otherwise expressly provided in this Chapter, the consent of any department, division, commission, board, body, bureau, or other agency of the State or without any other proceedings or conditions except as specifically authorized by this Chapter or by the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of, or any trust agreement securing, the bonds or notes.

Each bond or note that is represented by an instrument shall contain a statement signed by the Secretary of the Local Government Commission, or an assistant designated by the Secretary, certifying that the issuance of the bond or note has been approved under this Chapter. The signature may be a manual signature or a facsimile signature, as determined by the Local Government Commission. Each bond or note that is not represented by an instrument shall be evidenced by a writing relating to the obligation that identifies the obligation or the issue of which it is a part, contains the signed statement certifying approval of the Local Government Commission that is required on an instrument, and is filed with the Local Government Commission. A certification of approval by the Local Government Commission is conclusive evidence that a bond or note complies with this Chapter.

The proceeds of a bond or note shall be used solely for the purposes for which the bond or note was issued and shall be disbursed in accordance with the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bond or note and with any trust agreement securing the bond or note.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the Authority may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds have been executed and are available for delivery.

The Authority may secure a bond or note issued under this Chapter by a trust agreement between the Authority and a corporate trustee. The corporate trustee may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company inside or outside the State. The Authority may secure a bond or note issued under this Chapter by a deed of trust. The trustee of the deed of trust may be an individual who is a resident of the State. A bank or trust company that is incorporated in this State and is a depository of the proceeds of obligations, revenues, or other money of an Authority may furnish indemnifying bonds or pledge securities required by the Authority.The pledge of any assets, income, or revenues of the Authority to the payment of the principal of or the interest on any obligations of the Authority is binding from the time the pledge is made, and any assets, income, or revenues of the Authority are immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery or other act. The lien created by a pledge is binding against all persons who have claims of any kind against the Authority, regardless of whether they have notice of the lien.

A resolution authorizing the issuance of a bond or note and a trust agreement securing a bond or note may provide that any moneys held under the resolution or trust agreement may be temporarily invested pending disbursement. Any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, the moneys are deposited is considered a trustee of the moneys and must hold and apply the moneys for their stated purpose in accordance with this Chapter and the resolution or trust agreement. The Authority may invest any moneys, other than the proceeds of bonds issued to finance special user projects, as allowed in

G.S. 147-69.1

for investments of the State Treasurer or in this subsection. The proceeds of bonds issued to finance special user projects may be invested as provided in the security document for the bonds.In connection with or incidental to the acquisition or carrying of any investment relating to bonds, program of investment relating to bonds, or carrying of bonds, the Authority may, with the approval of the Local Government Commission, enter into a contract to place the investment or obligation of the Authority, as represented by the bonds, investment, or program of investment and the contract or contracts, in whole or in part, on an interest rate, currency, cash-flow, or other basis, including the following:

Interest rate swap agreements, currency swap agreements, insurance agreements, forward payment conversion agreements, and futures.

Contracts providing for payments based on levels of, or changes in, interest rates, currency exchange rates, or stock or other indices.

Contracts to exchange cash flows or a series of payments.

Contracts to hedge payment, currency, rate, spread, or similar exposure, including interest rate floors or caps, options, puts, and calls.The Authority may enter a contract of this type in connection with, or incidental to, entering into or maintaining any agreement that secures bonds. A contract shall contain the payment, security, term, default, remedy, and other terms and conditions the Board considers appropriate. The Authority may enter a contract of this type with any person after giving due consideration, where applicable, of the person’s credit-worthiness as determined by a rating by a nationally recognized rating agency or any other criteria the Board considers appropriate. In connection with, or incidental to, the issuance or carrying of bonds, or the entering of any contract described in this subsection, the Authority may enter into credit enhancement or liquidity agreements, with payment, interest rate, termination date, currency, security, default, remedy, and other terms and conditions as the Authority determines. Proceeds of bonds and any moneys set aside and pledged to secure payment of bonds or any of the contracts entered into under this subsection may be pledged to and used to service any of the contracts entered into under this section.

Bonds and notes are exempt from all State, county, and municipal taxation or assessment, direct or indirect, general or special, whether imposed for the purpose of general revenue or otherwise, excluding income taxes on the gain from the transfer of bonds and notes, and franchise taxes. The interest on bonds and notes is not subject to taxation as income.

Bonds or notes issued under this Chapter shall not constitute a debt secured by a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or a political subdivision of the State and shall be payable solely from the revenues, income, or assets of the Authority that are pledged for their payment. The face of each bond or note issued shall contain a statement that the Authority is obligated to pay the bond or note or the interest on the bond or note only from the revenues, income, or assets pledged in payment of the bond or note and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or any political subdivision of the State is pledged in payment of the principal of or the interest on the bond or note.

The State pledges to the holder of a bond or note issued under this Chapter that, as long as the bond or note is outstanding and unpaid, the State will not limit or alter the power the Authority had when the bond or note was issued in a way that impairs the ability of the Authority to produce revenues sufficient with other available funds to do all of the following:

Maintain and operate the project for which the bond or note was issued.

Pay the principal of, interest on, and redemption premium, if any, of the bond or note.

Fulfill the terms of an agreement with the holder.The State further pledges to the holder of a bond or note issued under this Chapter that the State will not impair the rights and remedies of the holder concerning the bond or note.

Obligations issued under this Chapter are made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the State and its political subdivisions, and all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The obligations are made securities that may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any State or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes, or obligations of the State is now or may be authorized by law.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 16; 1995, c. 46, s. 2; 2015-264, s. 16(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 16.(a), effective October 1, 2015, deleted “inheritance and gift taxes” preceding “income taxes on the gain” in subsection (
l
).

§ 63A-10.
Refunding bonds or notes.

Issuance. — The Authority may issue refunding bonds or notes for the purpose of refunding any outstanding bonds or notes issued under this Chapter, including any redemption premium on the bonds or notes and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption. Refunding bonds or notes shall be issued in accordance with the same procedures and requirements as bonds or notes. Refunding bonds or notes may be sold or exchanged for outstanding bonds and notes issued under this Chapter.Refunding bonds or notes may have different interest rates and maturities than the bonds or notes being refunded. The proceeds of refunding bonds or notes may be applied to any of the following:

The payment, purchase, and retirement of the bonds or notes being refunded by direct application to the payment, purchase, and retirement.

The payment, purchase, and retirement of the bonds or notes being refunded by the deposit in trust of the proceeds.

The payment of any expenses incurred in connection with the refunding.

For any other uses not inconsistent with the refunding.

Proceeds. — The proceedings providing for the issuance of refunding bonds or notes may limit the investments in which the proceeds of a particular refunding issue may be invested. Unless prohibited by the proceedings, the proceeds of refunding bonds or notes that are deposited in trust for the payment, purchase, and retirement of outstanding bonds or notes may be invested in any of the following:

Direct obligations of the United States of America.

Obligations whose principal and interest are guaranteed by the United States of America.

Evidences of ownership of a proportionate interest in an obligation that is described in subdivisions (1) or (2) of this subsection and is held in a custodial capacity by a bank or trust company organized under the laws of the United States of America or a state.

Obligations of the State or a unit of local government of the State when payment of the principal of and interest on the obligations has been provided for by depositing with a trustee or other escrow agent obligations that meet all of the following:

Are described in subdivisions (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection.

When due and payable, will provide enough money when added to any other money held in trust for this purpose to pay the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the State or local obligations.

Are rated in the highest category by Standard & Poor’s Corporation and Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.

Obligations of the State or a unit of local government when payment of the principal and interest on the obligations is insured by a bond insurance company rated in the highest category by Standard & Poor’s Corporation and Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.

Full faith and credit obligations of the State or a unit of local government of the State that are rated in the highest category by Standard & Poor’s Corporation and Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.

Any obligations or investments in which the State Treasurer is then authorized to invest funds of the State.

Scope. — This section does not limit any of the following:

The period for which the proceeds of refunding bonds or notes may be held in trust to retire the bonds or notes that are being refunded and have not matured, are not redeemable or, if redeemable, have not been called for redemption.

The power to issue bonds or notes for the combined purpose of refunding outstanding bonds or notes and of providing funds for any other corporate purpose.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.

§ 63A-11.
Special user project bonds or notes.

The Authority may, subject to the provisions of this section,

G.S. 63A-9

, and, if applicable,

G.S. 63A-10

, issue, at one time or from time to time, bonds and notes to finance or refinance special user projects. Bonds and notes to finance or refinance special user projects may be sold irrespective of the interest limitations in

G.S. 24-1.1

.

Bonds or notes issued by the Authority under this section are special, limited obligations of the Authority payable solely from the following:

The Authority’s revenues, income, or assets that it specifically assigns or pledges for payment.

The funds, collateral, and undertakings of a private party that are assigned or pledged by that party.

Bonds and notes issued under this section may be secured by one or more agreements, including foreclosable deeds of trust and other trust instruments. An agreement may pledge and assign to the trustee or the holders of its obligations the assets, revenues, and income provided for the security of the bonds or notes, including proceeds from the sale of any special user project or part thereof, insurance proceeds, condemnation awards, and third-party agreements, and may convey or mortgage the project and other property and collateral to secure a bond issue.The Authority may subordinate the bonds or notes or its rights, assets, revenues, and income derived from any special user project to any prior, contemporaneous, or future securities or obligations or lien, mortgage, or other security interest.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Authority may agree that all contracts relating to the acquisition, construction, installation, and equipping of the special user project shall be solicited, negotiated, awarded, and executed by the private parties for which the Authority is financing the special user project or any agents of the private parties subject only to approval by the Authority as the Authority may require. The Authority may, out of the proceeds of bonds or notes, make advances to or reimburse the private parties or their agents for all or a portion of the costs incurred in connection with the contracts.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-218, s. 5, effective July 1, 2001.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1; 1993, c. 553, s. 23; 2000-169, s. 37; 2001-218, s. 5.

§ 63A-12.
Public hearing requirements.

To the extent federal tax law requires public hearings to be held with respect to the issuance of bonds to finance projects, the hearings may be called for by the executive director and held before one or more members of the Board of the Authority. The hearings may be held at any place within the State pursuant to public notice given in accordance with current federal tax regulations. To the extent federal tax law requires approval following the hearing of the issuance of bonds to finance a project, the approval shall be sought from the Governor following a report to the Governor of the results of the public hearing accompanied by information relating to the purposes for the proposed bond issue.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.

§ 63A-13.
Financing agreements.

Every financing agreement shall contain provisions ensuring all of the following:

That the amounts payable under the financing agreement are sufficient to pay, when due, the principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest on the bonds issued to pay the costs of the special user project.

That the operator pays all costs incurred by the Authority in connection with the financing and administration of the special user project, except costs paid out of the proceeds of bonds or otherwise, including, but without limitation, insurance costs, the cost of administering the financing agreement and the security document, and the fees and expenses of the fiscal agent or trustee, paying agents, attorneys, consultants, and others.

That the operator pays all the costs and expenses of operation, maintenance, and upkeep of the special user project.

That the operator’s obligation to provide for the payment of the bonds in full is not subject to cancellation, termination, or abatement until the payment of the bonds or provision for their payment is made.

The financing agreement, if in the nature of a lease agreement, shall either provide that the obligor shall have an option to purchase, or require that the obligor purchase, the special user project upon the expiration or termination of the financing agreement subject to the condition that payment in full of the principal of, and the interest and any redemption premium on, the bonds, or provision therefor, shall have been made.

The financing agreement may provide the Authority with rights and remedies in the event of a default by the obligor including, without limitation, any one or more of the following:

Acceleration of all amounts payable under the financing agreement.

Reentry and repossession of the special user project.

Termination of the financing agreement.

Leasing or sale of foreclosure of the special user project to others.

Taking whatever actions at law or in equity may appear necessary or desirable to collect the amounts payable under, and to enforce covenants made in, the financing agreement.

The Authority’s interest in a special user project under a financing agreement may be that of owner, lessor, lessee, conditional or installment vendor, mortgagor, mortgagee, secured party, or otherwise, but the Authority need not have any ownership or possessory interest in the special user project.

The Authority may assign all or any of its rights and remedies under the financing agreement to the trustee or the bondholders under a security document.

The financing agreement may contain additional provisions as in the determination of the Board are necessary or convenient to effectuate the purposes of this Chapter. When, as provided in

G.S. 63A-9

and

G.S. 63A-11

, the Local Government Commission approves the issuance of bonds by the Authority, the Commission shall also approve all financing agreements and security documents.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 27.

§ 63A-14.
Security documents.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this Chapter may be secured by a security document which may be a trust instrument between the Authority and a bank or trust company or individual within the State, or a bank or a trust company outside the State, as trustee. The security document may pledge and assign the revenues provided for the security of the bonds, including proceeds from the sale of any project, or part thereof, insurance proceeds and condemnation awards, and may convey or mortgage the project and other property to secure a bond issue.

The revenues and other funds derived from the project, except for any part as may be necessary to provide reserves therefor, if any, may be set aside at regular intervals as may be provided in the security document in a sinking fund which may be pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on the bonds as the same shall become due and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as provided. The pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The revenues pledged and received by the Authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery or further act, and the lien of any pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the Authority, irrespective of whether the parties have notice. The use and disposition of money to the credit of the sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the security document. The security document may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including, without limitation, any one or more of the following:

Acceleration of all amounts payable under the security document.

Appointment of a receiver to manage the project and any other property mortgaged or assigned as security for the bonds.

Foreclosure and sale of the project and any other property mortgaged or assigned as security for the bonds.

Rights to bring and maintain such other actions at law or in equity as may appear necessary or desirable to collect the amounts payable under, or to enforce the covenants made in, the security document.

It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this State which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds, revenues, or other funds provided under this Chapter to furnish indemnifying bonds or to pledge securities as may be required by the Authority. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the security document may be treated as a part of the cost of the project in connection with which bonds are issued or as an expense of administration of the project.

The Authority may subordinate the bonds or its rights under the security document or otherwise to any prior, contemporaneous, or future securities or obligations or lien, mortgage, or other security interest.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.

§ 63A-15.
County agreements.

Any county in which all or part of a cargo airport complex site is located may enter into an agreement with the Authority providing for payments to be made by the county to the Authority. A county may not enter into an agreement to make payments to the Authority until after the Authority designates the cargo airport complex site. The county’s obligations under the agreement shall not constitute a pledge of its faith and credit.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.

§ 63A-16.
Remedies.

Any owner of bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this Chapter or any coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement securing or resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or notes, except to the extent the rights given may be restricted by the trust agreement or resolution, may either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State or granted hereunder or under the trust agreement or resolution, or under any other contract executed by the Authority pursuant to this Chapter; and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this Chapter or by the trust agreement or resolution by the Authority or by any officer of the Authority.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.

§ 63A-17.
Status of bonds and notes under Uniform Commercial Code.

All bonds and notes and interest coupons, if any, issued under this Chapter are made investment securities within the meaning of and for all the purposes of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code, as enacted in Chapter 25 of the General Statutes.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.

§ 63A-18.
Zoning power of Authority.

The Authority has exclusive zoning jurisdiction within a cargo airport complex site. The Authority has zoning jurisdiction within six miles of the boundaries of a cargo airport complex site.

No State agency and, in accordance with

G.S. 63-31

, no political subdivision may adopt, without obtaining the approval of the Authority, an airport zoning provision or other land use regulation that affects real property within six miles of any cargo airport complex site if it conflicts with a zoning provision or land use restriction adopted by the Authority.

A zoning provision or land use restriction adopted in violation of this subsection is not effective.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 108(h).

§ 63A-19.
Goals for participation by minorities, women, and the disabled.

The Authority shall verify its efforts to achieve the goals established in this section for participation by minority business enterprises, women’s business enterprises, and disabled business enterprises in the total value of contracts awarded by the Authority in each of the following categories:

Contracts for capital construction or repair projects.

Contracts for goods.

Contracts for professional and other services.

The goals for the Authority are as follows:

Ten percent (10%) participation by minority business enterprises.

Five percent (5%) participation by women’s business enterprises.

Two percent (2%) participation by disabled business enterprises.In determining participation in contract awards, a contract shall be counted as participation by a minority business enterprise without regard to the gender of the owner, but only if the business does not qualify as a disabled business enterprise. A contract shall be counted as participation by a women’s business enterprise only if the business does not also qualify as a disabled business enterprise. A contract shall be counted as participation by a disabled business enterprise without regard to the race or gender of the owner. The goals in this section, instead of any goals in Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, apply to the Authority. With respect to projects for which the Authority would not receive federal funds if it adhered to the goals in this section because the goals are contrary to or are inconsistent with 14 C.F.R. Part 152, Subpart E, Nondiscrimination in Airport Aid Program, the federal law and regulations supersede this section to the extent it is contrary to or inconsistent with the federal law and regulations.

The following definitions apply in this section:

Disabled business enterprise. — A legal entity, other than a joint venture, that is organized to engage in commercial transactions and is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned and controlled by one or more disabled persons.

Disabled person. — A handicapped person as defined in

G.S. 168A-3

.

Minority business enterprise. — A legal entity, other than a joint venture, that is organized to engage in commercial transactions and is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned and controlled by one or more minority persons.

Minority person. — A member of one of the following groups: African-Americans, Hispanic-Americans, American Indians, or Asian-Americans.

Women’s business enterprise means a legal entity, other than a joint venture, that is organized to engage in commercial transactions and is at least fifty-one percent owned and controlled by one or more women.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.

§ 63A-20.
Officers not liable.

No member or officer of the Authority shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of his execution of any bonds or notes or the issuance of any bonds or notes.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.

§ 63A-21.
Conflicts of interest.

If any member, officer, or employee of the Authority shall be interested either directly or indirectly, or shall be an officer or employee of or have an ownership interest in any firm or corporation, not including units of local government, interested directly or indirectly, in any contract with the Authority, the interest shall be disclosed to the Board and shall be set forth in the minutes of the Board. The member, officer, or employee having an interest shall not participate on behalf of the Authority in the authorization of any contract. Other provisions of law notwithstanding, failure to take any or all actions necessary to carry out the purposes of this section may not affect the validity of any bonds or notes issued under this Chapter.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.

§ 63A-22.
Cooperation by other State agencies.

All State officers and agencies shall render the services to the Authority within their respective functions as may be requested by the Authority.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.

§ 63A-23.
Annual reports.

The Authority shall, promptly following the close of each fiscal year, submit an annual written report of its activities for the preceding year to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Local Government Commission. Each report shall be accompanied by an audit of its books and accounts, as well as quarterly and annual financial statements. The audit shall be conducted by the State Auditor. The costs of all audits shall be paid from funds of the Authority.

As part of the report, the Authority shall include the following performance measures of the private sector jobs within the Global TransPark:

The number, type, and wage level of jobs created or retained.

The actual full-time equivalent jobs employed, as well as the median and average salaries for those jobs.

The Authority shall submit its annual report to the General Assembly to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations. The Authority shall also submit any information about the Authority’s activities that is requested by the Commission.

The Authority shall also provide a copy of its annual report on its public Web site.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 26; 2011-340, s. 1(e); 2021-180, s. 27.2(b).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-340, s. 1(e), effective July 1, 2011, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 27.2(b), effective July 1, 2021, in the first undesignated paragraph following subdivision (2), deleted “both” following “General Assembly to” and deleted “and the Program Evaluation Division” following “Operations.”